Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1908.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6113(c) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6113. Arrest for violation of order.* * *(c) Procedure following arrest.--Subsequent to an arrest, the defendant shall be taken by the police officer or sheriff without unnecessary delay before the court in the judicial district where the contempt is alleged to have occurred. When that court is unavailable, the police officer or sheriff shall convey the defendant to a magisterial district judge designated as appropriate by local rules of court or, in the city of Pittsburgh, to a magistrate of the Pittsburgh Magistrates Court 123456789101112131415161718 or, in counties of the first class, to the appropriate hearing officer. For purposes of procedure relating to arraignments for arrest for violation of an order issued under this chapter, the judges of Pittsburgh Magistrates Court shall be deemed to be magisterial district judges. Upon delivery of the defendant to the court, magisterial district judge, hearing officer or other appropriate venue or person, the police officer or sheriff shall forward notice of the arrest for indirect criminal contempt to the National Crime Information Center, or its successor organization, and the Commonwealth Law Enforcement Assistance Network, or its successor organization, within 24 hours.* * *Section 2. Section 6114(b)(3) and (6) of Title 23 are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6114. Contempt for violation of order or agreement.* * *(b) Trial and punishment.--* * *(1.1) A sentence for a subsequent conviction for contempt under this chapter shall include:(i) a fine of not less than $300 and supervised probation or imprisonment for a second conviction not to exceed six months;(ii) a fine of not less than $500 for a third conviction and supervised probation or imprisonment not to exceed one year; or(iii) a fine of not less than $1,000 for a fourth or subsequent conviction and supervised probation or imprisonment not to exceed two years.20250HB1908PN2386 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) [The] Except if the defendant is charged for a subsequent violation under paragraph (1.1)(ii) or (iii), the defendant shall not have a right to a jury trial on a charge of indirect criminal contempt. However, the defendant shall be entitled to counsel.* * *(6) The minimum [fine] fines required by [subsection (b)(1) allocated pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(i) and (iii)] paragraph (1.1) shall be used to supplement and not to supplant any other source of funds received for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1908PN2386 - 3 - 1234567891011121314